Maine, session 132, LD2009.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §951, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2003, c. 178, §2 and PL
2013, c. 16, §10, is further amended to read:
1. Annual audit. Every county shall have an audit made of its accounts annually
covering the last complete fiscal year by the Office of the State Auditor or by a certified
public accountant selected by the county commissioners. The audit must be performed in
accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and procedures pertaining to
governmental accounting. The auditor shall produce an audit report that includes the items
required in section 952‑A. When an audit is conducted by a certified public accountant,
the audit, upon completion, must be forwarded to the Office of the State Auditor within 12
months of the date of the close of the fiscal year. The Office of the State Auditor shall
review the audit for completeness. The audit, including the management letter, is a public
document and must be posted on the Office of the State Auditor's publicly accessible
website no later than 30 days after receipt.
The State Auditor is authorized to grant an exception to the requirement for a county to
forward a completed annual audit to the Office of the State Auditor within 12 months of
the date of the close of the fiscal year under extenuating circumstances as determined by
the State Auditor. The Office of the State Auditor shall make public any requests for an
exception along with the State Auditor's decision within 60 days of the receipt of a request
for an exception.
Page 1 - 132LR2731(03)